New Jersey, session 221, A2065.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established at Thomas Edison State University the Center for Career Relevant Education and Talent Evaluation of New Jersey, also known as CreateNJ. The purpose of the center shall be to maximize collaborations between employers, partner organizations, and institutions of higher education that develop and implement career pathways for nontraditional students and workers and workforce development programs. The center shall be the States central resource for the evaluation and translation of learning experiences into a validated record of academic credit, career credentials, pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship credits, and pertinent knowledge, skills, and abilities. The validated record developed by the center pursuant to this section shall be known as the CreateNJ Workforce Transcript. b.    (1)  The Center for Career Relevant Education and Talent Evaluation of New Jersey shall establish a steering committee, the purpose of which is to foster partnerships among education, government and industry for the mapping of credentials and to contribute to the direction and sustainability of the center. Members of the steering committee shall serve in an advisory capacity only. The members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. (2)   The steering committee shall consist of 12 members and shall be co-chaired by the President of Thomas Edison State University and the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, or their designees. Other members of the steering committee shall include, but not be limited to, one representative from each of the following: (a)   the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (b)   the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education; (c)   the Department of Education; (d)   the Economic Development Authority; (e)   the New Jersey Business and Industry Association; and (f)   the New Jersey Council of County Colleges. The steering committee shall also include three representatives of the New Jersey Presidents Council, preferably each from different sectors. c.     The Center for Career Relevant Education and Talent Evaluation of New Jersey shall establish a database that houses all of the skills or credits credentialed or accepted by Thomas Edison State University and other voluntarily participating institutions of higher education. The inclusion of an individuals higher education credit equivalencies or identified skills in the database shall be voluntary in nature, and participation shall be indicated by informed consent. Thomas Edison State University shall maintain the credits obtained through any evaluation of learning pursuant to this section by following national best practices and processes and by complying with applicable State and federal privacy laws and other guidelines and requirements for institutional accreditation from the Middle States Commission on Higher Education. d.    As permitted by law, Thomas Edison State University may enter into contracts with public or private individuals, organizations, and institutions to advance the purposes of this act. The Center for Career Relevant Education and Talent Evaluation of New Jersey shall apply for and accept grant funds, or any other funds, to support the operations and duties of the center, as made available by the federal government, private foundations or entities, or any other sources. e.     Thomas Edison State University may hire such additional staff as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. f.     The Center for Career Relevant Education and Talent Evaluation of New Jersey may assess fees for the utilization of the database and transcript generation. Any fee or other revenue collected by the center shall be used to fund the operations of the center. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.